Missouri, session 2026, HB3201.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.1001, to read as follows:
167.1001. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Election", any primary, general, or special election held to nominate or elect
an individual to public office, to retain or recall an elected officeholder, or to submit a
ballot measure to the voters;
(2) "Parent", a student's parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco
parentis to the student;
(3) "School", any school that is funded in whole or in part by state funds,
including, but not limited to, a public school or charter school.
2. A student shall not be considered absent from the school in which the student
is enrolled for the time during which the student accompanies his or her parent when
the parent is exercising his or her right to vote in a scheduled election.
3. A student may receive an excused absence pursuant to subsection 2 of this
section only one time during each scheduled election.
4. A student who accompanies his or her parent when the parent is exercising his
or her right to vote in a scheduled election shall be encouraged by school officials to
demonstrate his or her attendance at the scheduled election by wearing an official
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3201 2
sticker, badge, or other item upon his or her return to school indicating that he or she
attended the scheduled election.
✔